South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S832.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: University campus events zoning SECTION 1.    Section 53-1-20 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 53-1-20.    (A) As used in this section: (1) "Campus" means real property owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by a state-supported institution of higher learning, including stadiums, arenas, athletic facilities, performance venues, and associated grounds and parking areas, whether the property is located within or outside municipal boundaries. (2) "Event" means a concert, performance, commencement, lecture, exhibition, festival, ceremony, athletic contest, or similar gathering, whether hosted solely by the institution or in partnership with a third party, provided the event is approved by the governing board of the institution. (3) "Land use approval" means any approval, permit, determination, exception, variance, or authorization required because of the use of land or a land use classification under a local ordinance, including approvals administered by a zoning administrator, planning department, board of zoning appeals, or similar body. (B) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, college and university campuses shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 53-1-10. (C) No county or municipality may prohibit, restrict, condition, delay, or require a land use approval for an event held on the campus of a state-supported institution of higher learning based on any zoning ordinance, zoning district, overlay district, land use classification, or other land use regulation including, but not limited to, any requirement for a special exception, conditional use approval, variance, zoning permit, certificate of zoning compliance, zoning determination, site plan approval, development plan approval, or similar land use approval, provided that the event is approved by the governing board of the institution. (D) Nothing in this section may be construed to limit a county's or municipality's authority to apply and enforce generally applicable building, fire, life safety, health, and traffic laws and regulations. (E)(1) Any event sponsored in an outdoor venue within one thousand feet of a residential neighborhood must provide public notice of the proposed event and must notify any impacted neighborhood association recognized by the applicable municipality at least thirty days before the scheduled vote for approval by the governing board of the institution where the event is proposed to be held pursuant to subsection (C). The affected public and neighborhood associations must be given an opportunity to appear before the governing board of the institution prior to approval of the event. (2) This subsection applies only to nonathletic events, to events featuring speakers reasonably expected to attract one thousand or more attendees, and to outdoor musical concerts. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 15th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________